Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2410
Replevy of fine and costs; effect.

In all cases where the person or persons, convicted as aforesaid, shall replevy the fine and costs, as is provided in the section 29-2409, no execution shall issue for such fine and costs as prescribed in the section 29-2408, and further, such person or persons, after replevying the fine and costs as aforesaid, shall not be imprisoned for such fine and costs, but such person or persons shall be wholly discharged from any imprisonment in consequence of any conviction, unless where imprisonment is by this code made a part of the punishment. In that case such convicted person or persons shall be discharged from his, her or their imprisonment at the expiration thereof, if he, she or they have replevied the fine and costs as aforesaid.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 527, p. 838;

R.S.1913, § 9197;

C.S.1922, § 10204;

C.S.1929, § 29-2410;

R.S.1943, § 29-2410.